Washington statutes.
RCW 36.86.060

Restrictions on use of oil at intersections or entrances to county roads.

No oil or other material shall be used in the treatment of any county road or private road or driveway, of such consistency, viscosity or nature or in such quantities and in such proximity to the entrance to or intersection with any state highway or county road, the roadway of which is surfaced with cement concrete or asphaltic concrete, that such oil or other material is or will be tracked by vehicles thereby causing a coating or discoloration of such cement concrete or asphaltic concrete roadway. Any person violating the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.86.060. Prior: 1937 c 187 s 43; RRS s 6450-43.]